inc/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;


LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;

LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;

LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;


!
! yi-a-PFV
!

LEXICON yi-a-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@D.PREFIX@   yi-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@R.PREFIX.INNER@               yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@             yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@               yi-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yii-a@@D.PREFIX@ yii-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yii-a@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             yii-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yii-a@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@           yii-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yii-a@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             yii-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;


LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  


LEXICON yii-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;  

LEXICON yii-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #; 

LEXICON yii-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;  


!
! yi-PROG
!
LEXICON yi-PROG

@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@D.PREFIX@   yi-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.INNER@               yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@              yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@               yi-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yis@@D.PREFIX@ yis-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@            yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             yis-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@@D.PREFIX@ yii-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@            yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             yii-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 


LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yás   #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ás    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ás    #;

LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yis   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;

LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #; !  CHECKME
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@gás   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@gás   #;


LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;

LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;

LEXICON yii-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;


!
! yi-POT
!
LEXICON yi-POT

@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@D.PREFIX@   yi-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.INNER@               yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@              yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@               yi-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yis@@D.PREFIX@ yis-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@            yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             yis-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@@D.PREFIX@ yii-POT-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@            yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             yii-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #; ! 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #; ! 

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #; ! 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #; ! 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #; ! 

LEXICON yi-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #; ! 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #; ! 
